Hawaii, session 2026, GM1349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that deepfake technology
enables the realistic digital imitation of an individual’s
voice, face, likeness, and performance. The legislature further
finds that malicious uses of deepfake technology have been
documented in identity theft, fraud, election interference,
cyberbullying, and non-consensual pornography. Victims often
face reputational, financial, and emotional harm, with detection
rates for the use of deepfake imitations as low as sixty-two per
cent even among experts.
The legislature additionally finds that federal law
addresses limited scenarios of the malicious use of deepfake
technology, including explicit content targeting minors, but
leaves broad gaps in consumer and reputational protection.
Furthermore, the legislature finds that the State has a
compelling interest in preventing fraud, identity theft,
defamation, and emotional distress while also protecting lawful
speech. Moreover, the legislature finds that it is important to
2026-3283 HB2137 GDI HMSO
iiiiiiiBiimiiiBiiniiHii

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
protect Hawaii residents from identity-based harm caused by the
malicious use of artificial intelligence (AI) while safeguarding
constitutional rights to free expression, parody, satire, and
j ournalism.
Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Prohibit certain harmful uses of Al-generated personal
likenesses; and
(2) Provide civil remedies for individuals injured by
unauthorized Al-generated realistic digital
imitations.
SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by
adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read
as follows:
"CHAPTER
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE; DIGITAL IMITATION; PERSONAL LIKENESS;
PROTECTIONS
§ -1 Definitions. As used in this chapter:
"Advertisement" means a message published in any medium
with the primary purpose of promoting, directly or indirectly, a
product, service, or commercial transaction.
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives,
make predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real
or virtual environments, and that uses machine and human-based
inputs to:
(1) Perceive real and virtual environments;
(2) Abstract perceptions of real and virtual environments
into models through analysis in an automated manner;
and
(3) Use model inference to formulate opinions for
information or action.
"Consent" means express, written permission from a depicted
individual or the depicted individual's authorized
representative.
"Digital imitation" means any highly realistic Al-generated
depiction, audio, or video that is derived from or based upon
identifying characteristics of an actual, particular individual
and portrays that individual's voice, face, or likeness in a
sound recording or audiovisual work in which the individual did
not actually perform or appear.
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 3
iniiniMiiiiMiiiiHiiiiiiiii

Page 4 H.B. NO. Hfa
C.D. 1
"Harm" includes reputational injury, financial loss,
emotional distress, or the misappropriation of identity for
commercial gain.
"Publish" means to display, present, or release to the
public, or cause to be displayed, presented, or released to the
public.
"Realistic" means so lifelike that a reasonable person
would believe that the depiction, audio, or video portraying an
actual, particular individual's voice, face, or likeness is
authentic.
§ -2 Prohibited acts. It shall be unlawful for any
person to knowingly publish a realistic digital imitation of an
identifiable individual without that individual's consent if the
imitation:
(1) Is used in connection with an advertisement;
(2) Causes harm; or
(3) Is used to commit fraud, defamation, harassment, or
other criminal acts.
§ -3 Exemptions. This chapter shall not apply to
content generated or altered by artificial intelligence that is:
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 4

Page 5 2137
H.B. NO.
H.D. 3
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(1) A form of parody, satire, commentary, criticism,
scholarship, or political or educational expression;
(2) News reporting, where the content generated or altered
by artificial intelligence is used to illustrate a
story;
(3) A representation of the applicable individual as the
individual in a documentary or in a historical or
biographical manner, including some degree of
fictionalization; and
(4) An advertisement or commercial announcement for
content described in paragraphs (1) through (3);
provided that the applicable digital imitation is
relevant to the subject of the work so advertised or
announced.
§ -4 Civil actions; civil remedies. (a) If:
(1) A realistic digital imitation of an individual is
published in violation of section -2 without the
individual's consent; and
(2) The realistic digital imitation is not exempted under
section -3,
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 5
■nniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the individual or the individual's estate, for up to ten years
after the death of the individual, may bring an action for civil
remedies pursuant to subsection (b); provided that nothing in
this section shall be construed to extend the period of
limitation under chapter 657 applicable to the action in this
subsection.
(b) In accordance with subsection (a), an individual or an
individual's estate may bring a civil action for:
(1) Injunctive relief, including an order to remove or
cease distribution of the realistic digital imitation;
(2) Monetary damages of up to $25,000 per advertisement or
recovery of actual damages, including for reputational
injury and emotional distress;
(3) Punitive damages, where malice is proven; and
(4) Reasonable attorneys' fees and court costs.
(c) A cause of action for injunctive or other equitable
relief may be brought by the attorney general in instances in
which the distribution of realistic digital imitations involves
broad public interest or widespread harm. This subsection shall
not be construed to limit the right of an individual or
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 6
NHiRIMINiniillinilllll

Page 7 H.B. NO.
Hf3
C.D. 1
individual's estate, if applicable, to bring a civil action
pursuant to subsection (b).
(d) This section shall not limit or preclude the
individual or individual's estate, if applicable, from pursuing
any other available remedy.
§ -5 Application. (a) Except as provided in subsection
(b), this chapter shall apply to the fullest extent permitted by
federal law.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to any medium used for
the publication or dissemination of third-party content,
including but not limited to newspapers, magazines, television
networks and stations, streaming services, cable television
systems, and transit advertisements, by whom any content in
violation of this chapter is disseminated; provided that this
exemption shall apply only to the medium's role in publishing or
disseminating the third-party content and shall not be construed
to exempt the underlying conduct regulated by this chapter.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit or
expand the protections conferred by title 47 United States Code
section 230 on an interactive computer service for content
provided by another information content provider."
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 7
■MHiiiiiiiniiiiiiin

Page 8 H.B. NO.
"-3
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3283 HB2137 CDl HMSO 8
■11111111111111111111111111

H.B, NO. SgTs
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2137, HD 3, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2137, H.D. 3, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
65-26